Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.075

Investment of liquidation funds—Use of income.

All funds received by the director from liquidations may be invested by the director. The earnings from the moneys so held may be applied toward defraying the expenses incurred in the liquidations.

[ 1994 c 92 s 460; 1982 c 3 s 70; 1951 c 105 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.